src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Noun Inflection

LEXICON Noun1 !
  NOUN ;


!!

LEXICON NOUN
  +N: SGNOMSUF ;
  +N: SGGENSUF ;
  +N: SGACCSUF ;
  +N: SGDATSUF ;
  +N: SGLOCSUF ;
  +N: SGELASUF ;
  +N: SGPRLSUF ;

  +N: PLNOMSUF ;
  +N: PLGENSUF ;
  +N: PLACCSUF ;
  +N: PLDATSUF ;
  +N: PLLOCSUF ;
  +N: PLELASUF ;
  +N: PLPRLSUF ;

  +N: DUNOMSUF ;
  +N: DUGENSUF ;
  +N: DUACCSUF ;
! +N: DUDATSUF ;
! +N: PLLOCSUF ;
! +N: PLELASUF ;
! +N: PLPRLSUF ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ACTUAL CASES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
 +Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
 +Sg+Gen:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
 +Sg+Acc:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGDATSUF
 +Sg+Dat:%>n K ;

LEXICON SGLOCSUF
 +Sg+Loc:%>тини K ;

LEXICON SGELASUF
 +Sg+Ela:%>ta K ;

LEXICON SGPRLSUF
 +Sg+Prl:%>dme K ;






!! Start Plural

LEXICON PLNOMSUF
 +Pl+Nom:%>ˮ K ;

LEXICON PLGENSUF
 +Pl+Gen:%>n K ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF
 +Pl+Acc:%>n K ;

LEXICON PLDATSUF
 +Pl+Dat:%>ˮ%>дя K ;

LEXICON PLLOCSUF
 +Pl+Loc:%>ks K ;

LEXICON PLELASUF
 +Pl+Ela:%>ta K ;

LEXICON PLPRLSUF
 +Pl+Prl:%>dme K ;


!! Start Dual

LEXICON DUNOMSUF
 +Du+Nom: K ;

LEXICON DUGENSUF
 +Du+Gen:%>n K ;

LEXICON DUACCSUF
 +Du+Acc:%>n K ;

LEXICON DUDATSUF
 +Du+Dat:%>n K ;

LEXICON DULOCSUF
 +Du+Loc:%>ks K ;

LEXICON DUELASUF
 +Du+Ela:%>ta K ;

LEXICON DUPRLSUF
 +Du+Prl:%>dme K ;







!! Possessor Indices

LEXICON POS3SG
 +Px3Sg+Sg+Nom:%>ǯы      # ;
 +Px3Sg+Sg+Dat:%>нту%>дя # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
