src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns

ӈарка+N:ӈарка Noun1  "karhu" ;
кәукиа+N:кәукиа Noun1  "hirvi" ;
куодүму+N:куодүму Noun1  "aviomies" ;
ӈе”+N:ӈе” Noun1  "šamaani" ;
ӈуо+N:ӈуо Noun1  "jumala" ;
таа+N:таа Noun1  "poro" ;
томуӈку+N:томуӈку Noun1  "hiiri" ;
ӈүляǯә+N:ӈүляǯә Noun1  "susi" ;
китеǯә+N:китеǯә Noun1  "kuu" ;
